Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 8. Plumbing Code.

Administrative Code. —

For plumbing code, see 8 AAC 63.

For plumbers and electricians, see 8 AAC 90.

Collateral references. —

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Buildings, §§ 31, 32.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 51 — 64, 71.

Sec. 18.60.705.
Plumbing code.

Except as provided otherwise in this section, and unless the department adopts by regulation a later edition of the following publications or a later version of another nationally recognized code approved by the legislature by law, the following publications are adopted as the minimum plumbing code for the state:

paragraphs 101.3 — 101.5.6, 103.5.1.1 — 103.5.1.4, 103.5.3.5, 103.5.4.2, 103.5.5.1 — 103.5.5.2, 103.5.6.1 — 103.5.6.3, and 103.8 — 103.8.2 of chapter 1, chapters 2 — 14, and the appendices A through L of the 1997 edition of the Uniform Plumbing Code published by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials and adopted at the 67th annual conference, September 1996, excluding Table 4.1, “Minimum Plumbing Facilities”; and adding Appendix Chapter 29, Table A — 29 — A, “Minimum Plumbing Fixtures,” of the 1997 edition of the Uniform Building Code published in April 1997 by the International Council of Building Officials, except that for the category identified in Table A — 29 — A as “Assembly places—Auditoriums, convention halls, dance floors, lodge rooms, stadiums and casinos,” when the category is applied to auditoriums, convention halls, stadiums, and casinos, the ratios

indicating the number of water closets required for females are changed to provide the following:

four water closets for 1 — 50 females;

six water closets for 51 — 100 females;

10 water closets for 101 — 200 females;

14 water closets for 201 — 400 females; and

one additional water closet for each 100 females over 400 females; and

indicating the number of lavatories required for females and males are changed to

one lavatory for each water closet up to four water closets; and

one additional lavatory for each two additional water closets beyond four water closets;

the 1997 edition of the Uniform Swimming Pool, Spa, and Hot Tub Code published by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials and adopted at the 67th annual conference, September 1996, excluding pages 1 — 8 of Part I, Administration; and

the 1997 edition of the Uniform Solar Energy Code published by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials and adopted at the 67th annual conference, September 1996, excluding pages 1 — 7 of Part I, Administration.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the use of a pipe or pipe fitting containing more than 8.0 percent lead, or of solder or flux containing more than 0.2 percent lead in the installation or repair of a public water system or in the installation or repair of plumbing of a residential or nonresidential facility that provides water for human consumption is prohibited. This subsection does not apply to the use of leaded joints necessary to repair cast iron pipe.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a single-wall heat exchanger may be used if

the heat transfer medium is water type or propylene type glycol;

the pressure of the heat transfer medium is limited to a maximum of 30 pounds per square inch by an approved safety relief valve; and

the heat exchanger is prominently and permanently labeled with instructions concerning (1) and (2) of this subsection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 101 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 29 SLA 1991; am §§ 2, 3 ch 2 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.60.680

.
Renumbered in 1972.

Cross references. —

For certificates of fitness required to perform work subject to this section, see AS

18.62.010

.

Administrative Code. —

For plumbing code, see 8 AAC 63.

Sec. 18.60.710.
Duties of the department.

The department is responsible for the administration of the code.
The department may adopt regulations designed for maximum practical implementation of the code, and may grant exceptions from specific code provisions, where distance or other factors make implementation impractical.
Specific consideration shall be given to outlying villages and sparsely populated areas to ensure that AS

18.60.705

—

18.60.740

will not impose an undue financial burden. The department may by regulation designate appropriate inspection to a public or private utility company. A company so designated may refuse utility connections if an installation does not meet the requirements of this code.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.60.690

.
Renumbered in 1972.

Administrative Code. —

For plumbing code, see 8 AAC 63.

Sec. 18.60.715.
Administration.

The code applies to all new construction, all new work in relocated buildings, and to any alteration, repairs, or reconstruction of buildings except as provided otherwise under AS

18.60.705

—

18.60.740

.

The department may inspect work installed, removed, altered, or replaced on any plumbing, gas or drainage piping, plumbing fixture, water heater, or water treating equipment in a building or other location. A permit or inspection is not required for the following work: the stopping of leaks in drains, soil, waste, or vent pipes, the clearing of stoppages in or repairing of leaks in pipe valves or fixtures, and repairs or alterations not of a substantive nature that can be reasonably exempted from inspection.

Nothing in AS

18.60.705

—

18.60.740

prohibits a person from performing plumbing work on the person’s own property.

The department may adopt regulations establishing fees for inspections conducted under AS

18.60.705

—

18.60.740

. Fees may be established under this section only for inspections requested by the owner of a structure.

The department shall maintain a record of all plumbing inspections performed by it and of all inspection fees and permit fees collected by it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 88 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 18.60.700.
Renumbered in 1972.

In 1994 “section” was substituted for “chapter” in the second sentence of subsection (d) to correct a manifest error in § 2, ch. 88, SLA 1980.

Sec. 18.60.720.
Cost of permits.

If the department by regulation requires permits for plumbing work, fees may not exceed the following:

for issuing each permit . . . . . $2.00;

a permit for each

plumbing fixture or trap or set of fixtures on one trap, including water, drainage piping and backflow protection . . . . . 1.50;

building sewer or trailer park sewer . . . . . 5.00;

drain in rainwater system . . . . . 2.00;

cesspool . . . . . 5.00;

private sewage disposal system . . . . . 10.00;

water heater and/or vent . . . . . 1.50;

gas piping system of one to five outlets . . . . . 1.50;

gas piping system of six or more outlets, per outlet . . . . . .30;

industrial waste pretreatment interceptor, including its trap and vent, but excluding kitchen type grease interceptors functioning as fixture traps . . . . . 1.00;

installation, alteration, or repair of water piping or water treating equipment . . . . . 1.50;

repair or alteration of drainage or vent piping . . . . . 1.50;

lawn sprinkler system or any one meter which includes backflow protection devices . . . . . 2.00;

for vacuum breakers or backflow protective devices on tanks, vats, or for installation on unprotected plumbing fixtures including necessary water piping

one to five . . . . . 2.00;

over five, each . . . . . .30.

The department shall keep a record of all fees collected and all inspections performed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.60.710

.
Renumbered in 1972.

Administrative Code. —

For plumbing code, see 8 AAC 63.

Sec. 18.60.725.
Enforcement; reinspection.

A department inspector shall give written notice to the owner of a constructed premise or the contractor of a premise under construction of each violation of the code. The notice of violation must accurately describe the violation and give specific reference to the section and paragraph of the code. In addition, the notice must prescribe the necessary changes so that the work will comply with the code.

In case of complaints by a contractor, builder, or installer charging arbitrary actions or incompetence on the part of an inspector, the commissioner, after reviewing written presentation of the dispute, may require reinspection by a new inspector who has no connection with either disputant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.60.720

.
Renumbered in 1972.

Administrative Code. —

For plumbing code, see 8 AAC 63.

Sec. 18.60.730.
Penalty for violations.

A person who violates a provision of the code, and who, after receiving the notification required by AS

18.60.725

, refuses to correct the violation, after proof of the violation, is subject to a fine of not more than $1,000.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1972)

Sec. 18.60.735.
Borough or city regulation.

AS

18.60.705

—

18.60.740

do not affect the authority of a municipality to prescribe by ordinance, rule, or order, standards for their respective areas of jurisdiction no less stringent than those established under AS

18.60.705

. AS 18.60.705 —

18.60.740

are not intended to duplicate or preempt code administration or enforcement by municipalities. An organized municipality or unorganized village having less than 2,500 population is exempt from the provisions of AS 18.60.705 — 18.60.740.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1972; am § 27 ch 30 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.60.740

.
Renumbered in 1972.

Sec. 18.60.740.
Definitions.

In AS

18.60.705

—

18.60.740

,

“code” means the code adopted under AS

18.60.705

;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of labor and workforce development;

“department” means the Department of Labor and Workforce Development;

“inspector” means a qualified inspector employed by, designated by, or under contract to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 88 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 101 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 2 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.60.750

.
Renumbered in 1972.

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.